Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 15.2 Emergency Location of Governments for State Political Subdivisions

30-15.2-1.
Establishment.

Whenever, due to an emergency resulting from the effects of a disaster, or the anticipated effects of a potential disaster, it becomes imprudent, inexpedient, or impossible to conduct the affairs of local government at the regular or usual place or places of the local government, the governing body of each political subdivision of this state may meet at any place within or without the territorial limits of the political subdivision on the call of the principal executive officer or any two (2) members of the governing body, and shall proceed to establish and designate by ordinance, executive order, resolution, or other manner, alternate or substitute sites or places as the emergency temporary location, or locations, of government where all, or any part, of the public business may be transacted and conducted during the emergency situation. These sites or places may be within or without the territorial limits of the political subdivision and may be within or without this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 19, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 5.

30-15.2-2.
Validity of acts performed at emergency location.

During the period when the public business is being conducted at the emergency temporary location, or locations, the governing body and other officers of a political subdivision of this state shall have and possess and shall exercise, at that location, or locations, all of the executive, legislative, and judicial powers and functions conferred upon the body and officers by or under the laws of this state. These powers and functions may be exercised in the light of the exigencies of the emergency situation without regard to, or compliance with, time-consuming procedures and formalities prescribed by law and pertaining thereto, and all acts of the body and officers shall be as valid and binding as if performed within the territorial limits of their political subdivision.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-15.2-2

; P.L. 1963, ch. 19, § 1.

30-15.2-3.
Chapter controlling.

The provisions of this chapter shall control and be supreme in the event it shall be employed, notwithstanding any statutory, charter, or ordinance provision to the contrary or in conflict herewith.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-15.2-3

; P.L. 1963, ch. 19, § 1.